Wisconsin, session 2025, AB318.
do enact as follows:AB318,13Section 1. 93.23 (1) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:AB318,2,16493.23 (1) (e) Not later than 30 days after the close of the fair each year the 1county clerk, or the person appointed to file the statements under this paragraph 2by the county board, agricultural society, association, or board claiming state aid, 3shall file with the department, on forms provided by the department, an itemized 4statement verified on oath, showing net premiums actually paid or to be paid at the 5preceding fair, which must correspond with uniform premium lists and other 6requirements under par. (a). The statement shall also include a statement that at 7the fair all gambling devices whatsoever, the sale of intoxicating liquors, excepting 8fermented malt beverages, as defined in s. 125.02 (6), and wine, as defined in s. 9125.02 (22), and exhibitions of immoral character were prohibited and excluded 10from the fairgrounds and all adjacent grounds under the authority or control of the 11county board, agricultural society, association, or board claiming state aid. On or 12before the January 31 following the year in which the fair is held, the person filing 13the statements under this paragraph shall furnish the department a finance report 14of receipts and disbursements, attendance, and any other information that the 15department requires. Upon receipt of the required report, each fair shall be paid 16100 percent, or the prorated percentage, of the aid due the preceding year.AB318,2,1717